Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.120

Enterprise services account—Rental income.

All rental income collected by the department of enterprise services from rental of state buildings shall be deposited in the enterprise services account.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 254; 1998 c 105 s 14; 1994 c 219 s 14; 1965 c 8 s 43.82.120. Prior: 1961 c 184 s 5; 1959 c 255 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.